District of Columbia statutes.
42-802

Duty of Recorder.

It shall be the duty of the Recorder of Deeds to record all such mortgages and deeds of trust in the same manner as absolute deeds.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1271, ch. 854, § 523
June 30, 1902, 32 Stat. 532, ch. 1329
Apr. 3, 2001, D.C. Law 13-263, § 1601, 48 DCR 991
May 7, 2002, D.C. Law 14-132, § 602(b), 49 DCR 2551
1981 Ed., § 45-702.
1973 Ed., § 45-602.
D.C. Law 14-132 revived this section as of November 6, 2001. This section had been previously repealed by D.C. Law 13-263, § 1601.
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of Protections from Predatory Lending and Mortgage Foreclosure Improvements Temporary Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Law 14-86, March 19, 2002, law notification 49 DCR 2991).
Section 2 of Act 14-188, the “Protections from Predatory Lending and Mortgage Foreclosure Improvements Emergency Amendment Act”, deemed approved Nov. 27, 2001, without the signature of the Mayor, provided that D.C. Law 13-263 shall not apply beginning November 6, 2001, through March 6, 2002.
For temporary (90 day) revival of section, see § 403(b) of Home Loan Protection Emergency Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-295, March 1, 2002, 49 DCR 2534).